Alabama, session 2026rs, HB413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Beginning June 1, 2026, the Tuscaloosa
County Sheriff shall be entitled to receive the same longevity
pay as provided to all active full-time regular employees in
the service of Tuscaloosa County.
(b) The longevity pay available to the sheriff shall be
paid from the county general fund in the same manner as all
active full-time regular employees of Tuscaloosa County.
(c) The Tuscaloosa County Commission shall provide for:
(1) The amount of longevity pay that the sheriff
receives; and
(2) The date on which the longevity payment will be
made to the sheriff.
Section 2. (a) Beginning June 1, 2026, the Tuscaloosa
County Tax Assessor and the Tuscaloosa County Tax Collector
shall be entitled to receive the same longevity pay as
provided to all active full-time regular employees in the
service of Tuscaloosa County.
(b) The longevity pay available to the tax assessor and
tax collector shall be paid from the county general fund in
Page 1

tax collector shall be paid from the county general fund in
HB413 Enrolled
the same manner as all active full-time regular employees of
Tuscaloosa County.
(c) The Tuscaloosa County Commission shall provide for:
(1) The amount of longevity pay that the tax assessor
and tax collector receive; and
(2) The date on which the longevity payment will be
made to the tax assessor and tax collector.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB413 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 19-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3